static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 216 Y 324 # V глагол
SFX 216 0 ел/216 . +Pass
SFX 216 0 мә/239 . +Neg
SFX 216 0 мәгәндәр/116 . +Neg+Prc+Pl
SFX 216 0 мәгәндең/118 . +Neg+Prc+Gen
SFX 216 0 мәгәнгә/122 . +Neg+Prc+Dat
SFX 216 0 мәгәнгәрәк . +Neg+Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 216 0 мәгәнде/122 . +Neg+Prc+Acc
SFX 216 0 мәгәндән/118 . +Neg+Prc+Abl
SFX 216 0 мәгәндә/122 . +Neg+Prc+Loc
SFX 216 0 мәгәндәрәк . +Neg+Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 216 0 мәгәнмен/127 . +Neg+Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 216 0 мәгәнһең/127 . +Neg+Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 216 0 мәгәнбеҙ/131 . +Neg+Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 216 0 мәгәнһегеҙ/131 . +Neg+Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 216 0 мәгән/196 . +Neg+Prc
SFX 216 0 мәгәнме . +Neg+Prc+Q
SFX 216 0 мәгәнмелер . +Neg+Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 216 0 мәгәндер . +Neg+Prc+Indf
SFX 216 0 мәгәнсе . +Neg+Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 216 0 мәгәндеке/136 . +Neg+Prc+Poss
SFX 216 0 мәгәнкәй/140 . +Neg+Prc+Dim
SFX 216 0 мәгәндәй/142 . +Neg+Prc+Der/дай
SFX 216 0 мәгәнсә/144 . +Neg+Prc+Der/са
SFX 216 0 мәгәндәге/146 . +Neg+Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 216 0 мәгәнле/148 . +Neg+Prc+Der/лы
SFX 216 0 мәгәнһеҙ/152 . +Neg+Prc+Abe
SFX 216 0 мәгәнгәсә/156 . +Neg+Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 216 0 мәгәнерәк . +Neg+Prc+Comp
SFX 216 0 мәүселәр/116 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pl
SFX 216 0 мәүсенең/118 . +Neg+PrcPot+Gen
SFX 216 0 мәүсегә/122 . +Neg+PrcPot+Dat
SFX 216 0 мәүсегәрәк . +Neg+PrcPot+Dat+Comp
SFX 216 0 мәүсене/122 . +Neg+PrcPot+Acc
SFX 216 0 мәүсенән/118 . +Neg+PrcPot+Abl
SFX 216 0 мәүселә/122 . +Neg+PrcPot+Loc
SFX 216 0 мәүселәрәк . +Neg+PrcPot+Loc+Comp
SFX 216 0 мәүсемен/127 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred1Sg
SFX 216 0 мәүсеһең/127 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred2Sg
SFX 216 0 мәүсебеҙ/131 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred1Pl
SFX 216 0 мәүсеһегеҙ/131 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred2Pl
SFX 216 0 мәүсе/200 . +Neg+PrcPot
SFX 216 0 мәүсеме . +Neg+PrcPot+Q
SFX 216 0 мәүсемелер . +Neg+PrcPot+Q+Indf
SFX 216 0 мәүселер . +Neg+PrcPot+Indf
SFX 216 0 мәүсесе . +Neg+PrcPot+Clt/сы
SFX 216 0 мәүсенеке/136 . +Neg+PrcPot+Poss
SFX 216 0 мәүсекәй/140 . +Neg+PrcPot+Dim
SFX 216 0 мәүселәй/142 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/дай
SFX 216 0 мәүсесә/144 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/са
SFX 216 0 мәүселәге/146 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/дағы
SFX 216 0 мәүселе/148 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/лы
SFX 216 0 мәүсеһеҙ/152 . +Neg+PrcPot+Abe
SFX 216 0 мәүсегәсә/156 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/ҡаса
SFX 216 0 мәүсерәк . +Neg+PrcPot+Comp
SFX 216 0 мәүҙәр/116 . +Neg+Act+Pl
SFX 216 0 мәүҙең/118 . +Neg+Act+Gen
SFX 216 0 мәүгә/122 . +Neg+Act+Dat
SFX 216 0 мәүгәрәк . +Neg+Act+Dat+Comp
SFX 216 0 мәүҙе/122 . +Neg+Act+Acc
SFX 216 0 мәүҙән/118 . +Neg+Act+Abl
SFX 216 0 мәүҙә/122 . +Neg+Act+Loc
SFX 216 0 мәүҙәрәк . +Neg+Act+Loc+Comp
SFX 216 0 мәүмен/127 . +Neg+Act+Pred1Sg
SFX 216 0 мәүһең/127 . +Neg+Act+Pred2Sg
SFX 216 0 мәүбеҙ/131 . +Neg+Act+Pred1Pl
SFX 216 0 мәүһегеҙ/131 . +Neg+Act+Pred2Pl
SFX 216 0 мәү/196 . +Neg+Act
SFX 216 0 мәүме . +Neg+Act+Q
SFX 216 0 мәүмелер . +Neg+Act+Q+Indf
SFX 216 0 мәүҙер . +Neg+Act+Indf
SFX 216 0 мәүсе . +Neg+Act+Clt/сы
SFX 216 0 мәүҙеке/136 . +Neg+Act+Poss
SFX 216 0 мәүкәй/140 . +Neg+Act+Dim
SFX 216 0 мәүҙәй/142 . +Neg+Act+Der/дай
SFX 216 0 мәүсә/144 . +Neg+Act+Der/са
SFX 216 0 мәүҙәге/146 . +Neg+Act+Der/дағы
SFX 216 0 мәүле/148 . +Neg+Act+Der/лы
SFX 216 0 мәүһеҙ/152 . +Neg+Act+Abe
SFX 216 0 мәүгәсә/156 . +Neg+Act+Der/ҡаса
SFX 216 0 се . +Clt/сы
SFX 216 0 дем/241 . +Indc+PxSg1
SFX 216 0 дең/241 . +Indc+PxSg2
SFX 216 0 де/248 . +Indc+PxSg3
SFX 216 0 дек/252 . +Indc+PxPl1
SFX 216 0 дегеҙ/241 . +Indc+PxPl2
SFX 216 0 деләр/245 . +Indc+PxPl3
SFX 216 0 гәнмен/241 . +Past+PxSg1
SFX 216 0 гәнһең/241 . +Past+PxSg2
SFX 216 0 гән/241,282 . +Past+PxSg3
SFX 216 0 гәндәр/116 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 216 0 гәндең/118 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 216 0 гәнгә/122 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 216 0 гәнгәрәк . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 216 0 гәнде/122 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 216 0 гәндән/118 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 216 0 гәндә/122 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 216 0 гәндәрәк . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 216 0 гәнмен/127 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 216 0 гәнһең/127 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 216 0 гәнбеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 216 0 гәнһегеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 216 0 гән/196 . +Prc
SFX 216 0 гәнме . +Prc+Q
SFX 216 0 гәнмелер . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 216 0 гәндер . +Prc+Indf
SFX 216 0 гәнсе . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 216 0 гәндеке/136 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 216 0 гәнкәй/140 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 216 0 гәндәй/142 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 216 0 гәнсә/144 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 216 0 гәндәге/146 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 216 0 гәнле/148 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 216 0 гәнһеҙ/152 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 216 0 гәнгәсә/156 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 216 0 гәнерәк . +Prc+Comp
SFX 216 0 гәнбеҙ/241 . +Past+PxPl1
SFX 216 0 гәнһегеҙ/241 . +Past+PxPl2
SFX 216 0 гәндәр/245 . +Past+PxPl3
SFX 216 0 гәйнем/241 . +Plu+PxSg1
SFX 216 0 гәйнең/241 . +Plu+PxSg2
SFX 216 0 гәйне/248 . +Plu+PxSg3
SFX 216 0 гәйнек/252 . +Plu+PxPl1
SFX 216 0 гәйнегеҙ/241 . +Plu+PxPl2
SFX 216 0 гәйнеләр/245 . +Plu+PxPl3
SFX 216 0 әм/241 . +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 216 0 әмен/241 . +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 216 0 әһең/241 . +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 216 0 ә/248 . +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 216 0 әрәк . +Prc+Comp
SFX 216 0 әбеҙ/241 . +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 216 0 әһегеҙ/241 . +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 216 0 әләр/245 . +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 216 0 әсәкмен/241 . +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 216 0 әсәкһең/241 . +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 216 0 әсәк/252 . +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 216 0 әсәктәр/116 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 216 0 әсәктең/118 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 216 0 әсәккә/122 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 216 0 әсәккәрәк . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 216 0 әсәкте/122 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 216 0 әсәктән/118 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 216 0 әсәктә/122 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 216 0 әсәктәрәк . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 216 0 әсәкмен/127 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 216 0 әсәкһең/127 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 216 0 әсәкбеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 216 0 әсәкһегеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 216 0 әсәк/207 . +Prc
SFX 216 0 әсәкме . +Prc+Q
SFX 216 0 әсәкмелер . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 216 0 әсәктер . +Prc+Indf
SFX 216 0 әсәксе . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 216 0 әсәктеке/136 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 216 0 әсәккәй/140 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 216 0 әсәктәй/142 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 216 0 әсәксә/144 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 216 0 әсәктәге/146 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 216 0 әсәкле/148 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 216 0 әсәкһеҙ/152 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 216 0 әсәккәсә/156 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 216 0 әсәкерәк . +Prc+Comp
SFX 216 0 әсәкбеҙ/241 . +Fut2+PxPl1
SFX 216 0 әсәкһегеҙ/241 . +Fut2+PxPl2
SFX 216 0 әсәктәр/245 . +Fut2+PxPl3
SFX 216 0 һен/256 . +Imp+PxSg3
SFX 216 0 егеҙ/256 . +Imp+PxPl2
SFX 216 0 һендәр/260 . +Imp+PxPl3
SFX 216 0 әйем/262 . +Opt+PxSg1
SFX 216 0 әйек/266 . +Opt+PxSg2
SFX 216 0 һәм/270 . +Cond+PxSg1
SFX 216 0 һәң/270 . +Cond+PxSg2
SFX 216 0 һә/274 . +Cond+PxSg3
SFX 216 0 һәк/276 . +Cond+PxPl1
SFX 216 0 һәгеҙ/270 . +Cond+PxPl2
SFX 216 0 һәләр/272 . +Cond+PxPl3
SFX 216 0 гәс/280 . +GerAfter
SFX 216 0 гәсерәк . +GerAfter+Comp
SFX 216 0 гәнсә/278 . +GerUntil
SFX 216 0 гәнсәрәк . +GerUntil+Comp
SFX 216 0 еүселәр/116 . +PrcPot+Pl
SFX 216 0 еүсенең/118 . +PrcPot+Gen
SFX 216 0 еүсегә/122 . +PrcPot+Dat
SFX 216 0 еүсегәрәк . +PrcPot+Dat+Comp
SFX 216 0 еүсене/122 . +PrcPot+Acc
SFX 216 0 еүсенән/118 . +PrcPot+Abl
SFX 216 0 еүселә/122 . +PrcPot+Loc
SFX 216 0 еүселәрәк . +PrcPot+Loc+Comp
SFX 216 0 еүсемен/127 . +PrcPot+Pred1Sg
SFX 216 0 еүсеһең/127 . +PrcPot+Pred2Sg
SFX 216 0 еүсебеҙ/131 . +PrcPot+Pred1Pl
SFX 216 0 еүсеһегеҙ/131 . +PrcPot+Pred2Pl
SFX 216 0 еүсе/200 . +PrcPot
SFX 216 0 еүсеме . +PrcPot+Q
SFX 216 0 еүсемелер . +PrcPot+Q+Indf
SFX 216 0 еүселер . +PrcPot+Indf
SFX 216 0 еүсесе . +PrcPot+Clt/сы
SFX 216 0 еүсенеке/136 . +PrcPot+Poss
SFX 216 0 еүсекәй/140 . +PrcPot+Dim
SFX 216 0 еүселәй/142 . +PrcPot+Der/дай
SFX 216 0 еүсесә/144 . +PrcPot+Der/са
SFX 216 0 еүселәге/146 . +PrcPot+Der/дағы
SFX 216 0 еүселе/148 . +PrcPot+Der/лы
SFX 216 0 еүсеһеҙ/152 . +PrcPot+Abe
SFX 216 0 еүсегәсә/156 . +PrcPot+Der/ҡаса
SFX 216 0 еүсерәк . +PrcPot+Comp
SFX 216 0 еүҙәр/116 . +Act+Pl
SFX 216 0 еүҙең/118 . +Act+Gen
SFX 216 0 еүгә/122 . +Act+Dat
SFX 216 0 еүгәрәк . +Act+Dat+Comp
SFX 216 0 еүҙе/122 . +Act+Acc
SFX 216 0 еүҙән/118 . +Act+Abl
SFX 216 0 еүҙә/122 . +Act+Loc
SFX 216 0 еүҙәрәк . +Act+Loc+Comp
SFX 216 0 еүмен/127 . +Act+Pred1Sg
SFX 216 0 еүһең/127 . +Act+Pred2Sg
SFX 216 0 еүбеҙ/131 . +Act+Pred1Pl
SFX 216 0 еүһегеҙ/131 . +Act+Pred2Pl
SFX 216 0 еү/196 . +Act
SFX 216 0 еүме . +Act+Q
SFX 216 0 еүмелер . +Act+Q+Indf
SFX 216 0 еүҙер . +Act+Indf
SFX 216 0 еүсе . +Act+Clt/сы
SFX 216 0 еүҙеке/136 . +Act+Poss
SFX 216 0 еүкәй/140 . +Act+Dim
