static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.dic
күбел/216	[Verb]
игел/216	[Verb]
теҙел/216	[Verb]
ейел/216	[Verb]
йәйел/216	[Verb]
эркел/216	[Verb]
һөйләнел/216	[Verb]
эшләнел/216	[Verb]
еңел/216	[Verb]
йәйелдерел/216	[Verb]
мендерел/216	[Verb]
әйләндерел/216	[Verb]
төрләндерел/216	[Verb]
кәүҙәләндерел/216	[Verb]
емерел/216	[Verb]
кисерел/216	[Verb]
терел/216	[Verb]
килтерел/216	[Verb]
бестерел/216	[Verb]
етештерел/216	[Verb]
үҙәкләштерел/216	[Verb]
мөкәммәлләштерел/216	[Verb]
берләштерел/216	[Verb]
сәхнәләштерел/216	[Verb]
ишерел/216	[Verb]
бирел/216	[Verb]
күрел/216	[Verb]
күтәрелеп-бәрел/216	[Verb]
түңкәрел/216	[Verb]
этәрел/216	[Verb]
сәнсел/216	[Verb]
сәсел/216	[Verb]
тел/216	[Verb]
кәметел/216	[Verb]
үрсетел/216	[Verb]
ишетел/216	[Verb]
әйтел/216	[Verb]
терелтел/216	[Verb]
йүгертел/216	[Verb]
тиртел/216	[Verb]
эшкәртел/216	[Verb]
төҙәтел/216	[Verb]
йөкләтел/216	[Verb]
ситләтел/216	[Verb]
йүнәтел/216	[Verb]
киҫәтел/216	[Verb]
килешел/216	[Verb]
тишел/216	[Verb]
кил/216	[Verb]
төбәл/216	[Verb]
төҙәл/216	[Verb]
текәл/216	[Verb]
төңкәл/216	[Verb]
бөркәл/216	[Verb]
көрмәл/216	[Verb]
сәйнәл/216	[Verb]
көҙрәл/216	[Verb]
көрәл/216	[Verb]
кипсәл/216	[Verb]
үртәл/216	[Verb]
йәшәл/216	[Verb]
ебен/216	[Verb]
теген/216	[Verb]
һиҙен/216	[Verb]
елкен/216	[Verb]
үкен/216	[Verb]
килен/216	[Verb]
мен/216	[Verb]
һикерен/216	[Verb]
тикшерен/216	[Verb]
күрен/216	[Verb]
кәпәрен/216	[Verb]
сәнсен/216	[Verb]
әсен/216	[Verb]
тиртен/216	[Verb]
этен/216	[Verb]
күҙһен/216	[Verb]
екһен/216	[Verb]
күңелһен/216	[Verb]
түбәнһен/216	[Verb]
ғәжәпһен/216	[Verb]
ирһен/216	[Verb]
ишһен/216	[Verb]
өләшен/216	[Verb]
күн/216	[Verb]
иҫергән/216	[Verb]
биҙән/216	[Verb]
биҙән-төҙән/216	[Verb]
һөйкән/216	[Verb]
һиҫкән/216	[Verb]
теҙлән/216	[Verb]
күңелһеҙлән/216	[Verb]
имһеҙлән/216	[Verb]
теҙгенһеҙлән/216	[Verb]
тәртипһеҙлән/216	[Verb]
хәтерһеҙлән/216	[Verb]
бәҫһеҙлән/216	[Verb]
шөкәтһеҙлән/216	[Verb]
кәйефһеҙлән/216	[Verb]
һөмһөҙлән/216	[Verb]
өмөтһөҙлән/216	[Verb]
эҙлән/216	[Verb]
ирәбелән/216	[Verb]
бәрәңгелән/216	[Verb]
киҫкелән/216	[Verb]
тилелән/216	[Verb]
серлелән/216	[Verb]
кирелән/216	[Verb]
инселән/216	[Verb]
эҫелән/216	[Verb]
кәгезлән/216	[Verb]
етдилән/216	[Verb]
йөйлән/216	[Verb]
әйлән/216	[Verb]
семәкәйлән/216	[Verb]
еклән/216	[Verb]
кейеклән/216	[Verb]
йүгереклән/216	[Verb]
эремсеклән/216	[Verb]
үтеклән/216	[Verb]
биклән/216	[Verb]
өҙөклән/216	[Verb]
һөҙлөклән/216	[Verb]
өлтөклән/216	[Verb]
төбәклән/216	[Verb]
имгәклән/216	[Verb]
илгиҙәклән/216	[Verb]
төйәклән/216	[Verb]
беләклән/216	[Verb]
түңгәләклән/216	[Verb]
сөгөрмәклән/216	[Verb]
йәйпәклән/216	[Verb]
күкрәклән/216	[Verb]
күңелсәклән/216	[Verb]
киҫәклән/216	[Verb]
терһәклән/216	[Verb]
еллән/216	[Verb]
дүрткеллән/216	[Verb]
күкһеллән/216	[Verb]
гөллән/216	[Verb]
шөғөллән/216	[Verb]
түллән/216	[Verb]
кәллән/216	[Verb]
хәллән/216	[Verb]
шәлкемлән/216	[Verb]
өлкөмлән/216	[Verb]
тәғәмлән/216	[Verb]
күркәмлән/216	[Verb]
тәғәйенлән/216	[Verb]
йөнлән/216	[Verb]
йәнлән/216	[Verb]
зәңгәрһыу-көрәнлән/216	[Verb]
күсәнлән/216	[Verb]
иҫәүәнлән/216	[Verb]
миңлән/216	[Verb]
төлкөлән/216	[Verb]
көслөлән/216	[Verb]
ғәйеплән/216	[Verb]
киплән/216	[Verb]
сүплән/216	[Verb]
кәләплән/216	[Verb]
тәкәбберлән/216	[Verb]
әҙерлән/216	[Verb]
үткерлән/216	[Verb]
бирлән/216	[Verb]
әсирлән/216	[Verb]
төҫмөрлән/216	[Verb]
әрлән/216	[Verb]
бөгәрлән/216	[Verb]
эҙәрлән/216	[Verb]
шәкәрлән/216	[Verb]
тәпәрлән/216	[Verb]
бөтәрлән/216	[Verb]
ҡәһәрлән/216	[Verb]
хәсислән/216	[Verb]
бөкөслән/216	[Verb]
көләслән/216	[Verb]
әтәслән/216	[Verb]
дөмбәҫлән/216	[Verb]
иләҫлән/216	[Verb]
төтәҫлән/216	[Verb]
дегетлән/216	[Verb]
кәнфитлән/216	[Verb]
бөләңгертлән/216	[Verb]
дәртлән/216	[Verb]
шәрбәтлән/216	[Verb]
ғәҙәтлән/216	[Verb]
нәзәкәтлән/216	[Verb]
ғәләмәтлән/216	[Verb]
һүрәтлән/216	[Verb]
мөрхәтлән/216	[Verb]
һәлкәүлән/216	[Verb]
тәкәллефлән/216	[Verb]
йәтешлән/216	[Verb]
йәшлән/216	[Verb]
сәбәлән/216	[Verb]
вәғәҙәлән/216	[Verb]
бүлкәлән/216	[Verb]
шәүләлән/216	[Verb]
йүпәлән/216	[Verb]
сәпсәлән/216	[Verb]
мәтәлән/216	[Verb]
ишәлән/216	[Verb]
кинән/216	[Verb]
өйрән/216	[Verb]
һелтән/216	[Verb]
ең/216	[Verb]
